District of Columbia statutes.
38-2606

Existing state agency responsibilities.

All District agencies, including the District of Columbia Public School system, currently performing state-level functions related to public education shall continue to perform such functions until such date as those functions are transferred away from them pursuant to approved transition plans. The Mayor and Council shall provide such funds as are necessary to enable such agencies to continue to perform such functions.

History

Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-176, § 7, 47 DCR 6835

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-2602.01 and § 38-2605.01.